Nevada, session 83, SB392.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 32 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 117, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 to 22,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 3. “Business” includes any activity engaged in by any
person or caused to be engaged in by any person with the object of
gain, benefit or advantage, either direct or indirect.
Sec. 4. “Computer software” means a set of coded
instructions designed to cause a computer or automatic data
processing equipment to perform a task.
Sec. 5. “Digital audio works” means works that result from
the fixation of a series of musical, spoken or other sounds,
including, without limitation, ringtones.
Sec. 6. “Digital audio-visual works” means a series of
related images which, when shown in succession, impart an
impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any.
Sec. 7. “Digital books” means works that are generally
recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as “books.”
Sec. 8. “Electronically transferred” means obtained by the
purchaser by means other than tangible storage media.
Sec. 9. “End user” means any person who receives a
specified digital product, other than a person who receives by
contract a specified digital product for further commercial
broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing,
relicensing, distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the
specified digital product, in whole or in part, to another person or
persons.
-
*SB392*

– 3 –
Sec. 10. 1. “Gross receipts” means the total amount of the
sales price or lease or rental price, as the case may be, of the retail
sales of specified digital products of retailers of specified digital
products, valued in money, whether received in money or
otherwise, without any deduction on account of any of the
following:
(a) The cost of the specified digital products sold, except that,
in accordance with such rules and regulations as the Department
may prescribe, a deduction may be taken if the retailer has
purchased specified digital products for some other purpose than
resale, has reimbursed the vendor of the specified digital products
for tax which the vendor is required to pay to the State or has paid
the use tax with respect to the specified digital products, and has
resold the specified digital products before making any use of the
specified digital products other than the broadcast, rebroadcast,
transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distributing,
redistributing or exhibition in the regular course of business. If
such a deduction is taken by the retailer, no refund or credit will
be allowed to the vendor of the specified digital products with
respect to the sale of the specified digital products.
(b) The cost of the materials used, labor or service cost,
interest paid, losses or any other expense.
2. The total amount of the sales or lease or rental price
includes all of the following:
(a) Any services that are a part of the sale.
(b) All receipts, cash, credits and property of any kind.
(c) Any amount for which credit is allowed by the seller to the
purchaser.
3. “Gross receipts” does not include any of the following:
(a) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.
(b) The sales price of specified digital products returned by
customers when the full sales price is refunded either in cash or
credit, but this exclusion does not apply in any instance when the
customer, in order to obtain the refund, is required to purchase
other specified digital products at a price greater than the amount
charged for the specified digital products that are returned.
(c) The price received for labor or services used in installing or
applying the specified digital products sold.
(d) The amount of any tax imposed by the United States upon
or with respect to retail sales, whether imposed upon the retailer or
the end user.
4. For purposes of the tax imposed by section 24 of this act, if
a retailer establishes to the satisfaction of the Department that the
tax has been added to the total amount of the sales price and has
not been absorbed by the retailer, the total amount of the sales
-
*SB392*

– 4 –
price shall be deemed to be the amount received exclusive of the
tax imposed.
Sec. 11. “In this State” or “in the State” means within the
exterior limits of the State of Nevada and includes all territory
within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of
America.
Sec. 12. 1. “Occasional sale” includes:
(a) A sale of specified digital products not held or used by a
seller in the course of an activity for which the seller is required to
hold a seller’s permit, if the sale is not one of a series of sales
sufficient in number, scope and character to constitute an activity
requiring the holding of a seller’s permit.
(b) Any transfer of all or substantially all the specified digital
products held or used by a person in the course of such an activity
when after such transfer the real or ultimate ownership of such
property is substantially similar to that which existed before such
transfer.
2. For the purposes of this section, stockholders,
bondholders, partners or other persons holding an interest in a
corporation or other entity are regarded as having the “real or
ultimate ownership” of the specified digital products of the
corporation or other entity.
Sec. 13. “Other digital products”:
1. Means greeting cards, digital images, video or electronic
games or news and prewritten computer software, as defined in
NRS 360B.470.
2. Does not include:
(a) Computer software that is not prewritten computer
software.
(b) The storage, management and dissemination of data and
information on a cloud network, server or other digital storage
medium.
(c) The provision of maintenance services for computer
software, provided that, if the purchase of the maintenance
services occurs at the same time as the purchase of the software,
the maintenance services are optional and are separately stated on
any invoice, billing or other document given to a purchaser.
(d) Internet service.
(e) Payment processing services, including, without limitation,
services for processing payments from retail sales and peer-to-peer
money transfers.
(f) Accounting, bookkeeping and check preparation services.
(g) Internet broadcasts of live entertainment or educational or
informational presentations.
(h) Website hosting, storage or backup.
-
*SB392*

– 5 –
(i) The transmission of educational or instructional
programming, including, without limitation, the transmission of
courses by an elementary or secondary school, vocational or
technical school or institution of higher education or the
transmission of courses of professional development.
(j) The services of a travel agent.
(k) Cryptocurrency or digital currency, not including
simulated currencies or in-game currencies which are not
intended to be convertible to legal tender.
(l) Gift cards.
Sec. 14. “Purchase” means any transfer, exchange or barter,
conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means
whatsoever, of specified digital products for a consideration.
Sec. 15. “Retail sale” or “sale at retail” means a sale for any
purpose other than resale in the regular course of business of
specified digital products.
Sec. 16. 1. “Retailer” includes:
(a) Every seller who makes any retail sale or sales of specified
digital products.
(b) Every person engaged in the business of making sales of
specified digital products for use.
(c) Every person making more than two retail sales of specified
digital products during any 12-month period, including sales made
in the capacity of assignee for the benefit of creditors or a receiver
or trustee in bankruptcy.
2. When the Nevada Tax Commission determines that it is
necessary for the efficient administration of this chapter to regard
any salespersons, representatives, peddlers or canvassers as the
agents of the dealers, distributors, supervisors or employers under
whom they operate or from whom they obtain the specified digital
products sold by them, irrespective of whether they are making
sales on their own behalf or on behalf of such dealers,
distributors, supervisors or employers, the Nevada Tax
Commission may so regard them and may regard the dealers,
distributors, supervisors or employers as retailers for purposes of
this chapter.
Sec. 17. “Ringtones” means digitized sound files that are
downloaded onto a device and that may be used to alert the
customer with respect to a communication.
Sec. 18. “Sale” means and includes any transfer of title or
possession, exchange, barter, lease or rental, conditional or
otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of
specified digital products for a consideration, including, without
limitation, any such transfer, exchange or barter on a subscription
basis.
-
*SB392*

– 6 –
Sec. 19. 1. “Sales price” means the total amount for which
specified digital products are sold, valued in money, whether paid
in money or otherwise, without any deduction on account of any
of the following:
(a) The cost of the specified digital products sold.
(b) The cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest
charged, losses or any other expenses.
(c) The cost of transmitting the specified digital products
before purchase.
2. The total amount for which specified digital products are
sold includes all of the following:
(a) Any services that are a part of the sale.
(b) Any amount for which credit is given to the purchaser by
the seller.
3. “Sales price” does not include any of the following:
(a) Cash discounts allowed and taken on sales.
(b) The amount charged for specified digital products returned
by customers when the entire amount charged therefor is refunded
either in cash or credit, except that this exclusion does not apply in
any instance when the customer, in order to obtain the refund, is
required to purchase other specified digital products at a price
greater than the amount charged for the specified digital products
that are returned.
(c) The amount charged for labor or services rendered in
installing or applying the specified digital products sold.
(d) The amount of any tax, not including any manufacturers’
or importers’ excise tax, imposed by the United States upon or
with respect to retail sales, whether imposed upon the retailer or
the consumer.
Sec. 20. “Seller” includes every person engaged in the
business of selling specified digital products of a kind, the gross
receipts from the retail sale of which are required to be included in
the measure of the tax imposed by section 24 of this act.
Sec. 21. 1. “Specified digital products” means
electronically transferred:
(a) Digital audio works;
(b) Digital audio-visual works;
(c) Digital books;
(d) Digital codes; and
(e) Other digital products.
2. The term does not include:
(a) Direct-to-home satellite services, as defined in 47 U.S.C. §
303(v).
(b) Video service, as defined in NRS 711.141.
3. As used in this section, “digital code”:
-
*SB392*

– 7 –
(a) Means a method that permits a purchaser to obtain or
access at a later date specified digital products.
(b) Does not include public or private keys when used in a
transaction conducted on a blockchain. As used in this paragraph:
(1) “Blockchain” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 719.045.
(2) “Private key” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 720.100.
(3) “Public key” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 720.110.
Sec. 22. “Subscription” means any arrangement in which a
person has the right or ability to access, receive, use, obtain,
purchase or otherwise acquire specified digital products on a
permanent or less than permanent basis, regardless of whether the
person actually accesses, receives, uses, obtains, purchases or
otherwise acquires such specified digital products.
Sec. 23. For the purposes of this chapter, a retail sale of
specified digital products shall be deemed to take place:
1. If the specified digital products are received by the
purchaser at a place of business of the seller, at that place of
business.
2. If the specified digital products are not received by the
purchaser at a place of business of the seller:
(a) At the location indicated to the seller pursuant to any
instructions provided for the delivery of the specified digital
products to the purchaser or to another recipient who is
designated by the purchaser as his or her donee; or
(b) If no such instructions are provided and if known by the
seller, at the location where the purchaser or another recipient
who is designated by the purchaser as his or her donee, receives
the specified digital products.
3. If subsections 1 and 2 do not apply, at the address of the
purchaser indicated in the business records of the seller that are
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller’s business, unless
the use of that address would constitute bad faith.
4. If subsections 1, 2 and 3 do not apply, at the address of the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale,
including, if no other address is available, the address of the
purchaser’s instrument of payment, unless the use of an address
pursuant to this subsection would constitute bad faith.
5. In all other circumstances, at the address from which the
specified digital products were shipped.
Sec. 24. 1. An excise tax is hereby imposed upon the retail
sale of specified digital products to an end user in this State, in an
amount equal to the sum of the rates of all taxes imposed upon
-
*SB392*

– 8 –
sales at retail of tangible personal property in the county in which
the retail sale of the specified digital goods takes place, as
determined pursuant to section 23 of this act, multiplied by the
gross receipts of the retailer of the specified digital products.
2. The tax imposed by subsection 1 applies whether the
purchaser obtains permanent use or less than permanent use of
the specified digital product, whether the sale is conditioned or not
conditioned upon continued payment from the purchaser and
whether the sale is on a subscription basis or is not on a
subscription basis.
Sec. 25. The tax imposed by section 24 of this act must be
collected by the retailer from the end user insofar as it can be
done.
Sec. 26. 1. It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise or
hold out or state to the public or to any customer, directly
or indirectly, that the tax or any part thereof will be assumed or
absorbed by the retailer or that it will not be added to the selling
price of the specified digital products sold or that, if added, it or
any part thereof will be refunded.
2. Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty
of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 27. 1. A person shall not engage in or conduct
business as a seller in this State unless the person has:
(a) Registered with the Department pursuant to NRS
360B.200; or
(b) Obtained a permit issued by the Department.
2. Every application for a permit must:
(a) Be made upon a form prescribed by the Department.
(b) Set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or
intends to transact business and the location of the applicant’s
place or places of business.
(c) Set forth any other information which the Department may
require.
(d) Be accompanied by a fee of $5.
(e) Be signed by:
(1) The owner if he or she is a natural person;
(2) A member or partner if the seller is an association or
partnership; or
(3) An executive officer or some person specifically
authorized to sign the application if the seller is a corporation.
Written evidence of the signer’s authority must be attached to the
application.
Sec. 28. 1. If the holder of a permit issued pursuant to this
chapter fails to comply with any provision of this chapter or any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the Department may revoke
-
*SB392*

– 9 –
or suspend any one or more of the permits held by the person.
Before doing so, the Department must hold a hearing after giving
10 days’ written notice to the holder of the permit. The notice must
specify the time and place of the hearing and require the holder of
the permit to show cause why the permit should not be suspended
or revoked.
2. If a permit is suspended or revoked, the Department must
give written notice of the action to the holder of the permit.
3. The notices required by this section may be served
personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of
notice of a deficiency determination.
4. The Department shall not issue a new permit after the
revocation of a permit unless the Department is satisfied that the
former holder of the permit will comply with the provisions of this
chapter and the regulations of the Department adopted pursuant
thereto.
5. A retailer whose permit has been suspended or revoked
must pay the Department a fee of $5 for the reinstatement of the
permit or the issuance of a new permit.
Sec. 29. For the purpose of the proper administration of this
chapter and to prevent evasion of the tax imposed by section 24 of
this act, it is presumed that all gross receipts are subject to the tax
until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale
of specified digital products is not a sale at retail is upon the
person who makes the sale unless the person takes from the
purchaser a certificate to the effect that the specified digital
products were purchased by an end user and the purchaser:
1. Is engaged in the business of commercial broadcasting,
rebroadcasting, transmitting, retransmitting, licensing,
relicensing, distributing, redistributing or exhibiting specified
digital products, in whole or in part, to another person or persons;
2. Is registered pursuant to NRS 360B.200 or holds a permit
issued pursuant to section 27 of this act, if required; and
3. At the time of purchasing the specified digital product,
intends to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license,
relicense, distribute, redistribute or exhibit the specified digital
product in the regular course of business or is unable to ascertain
at the time of purchase whether the specified digital product will
be used for such a purpose or will be used for some other purpose.
Sec. 30. A resale certificate must:
1. Be substantially in such form and include such
information as the Department may prescribe; and
2. Unless submitted in electronic form, be signed by the
purchaser.
-
*SB392*

– 10 –
Sec. 31. 1. If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate
makes any use of specified digital products other than the
commercial broadcasting, rebroadcasting, transmitting,
retransmitting, licensing, relicensing, distributing, redistributing
or exhibiting of the specified digital products, in whole or in part,
to another person or persons in the regular course of business:
(a) The use is taxable to the purchaser as of the time one of the
specified digital products is first so used by the purchaser, and
the sales price of the specified digital products to the purchaser is
the measure of the tax.
(b) The seller is liable for the tax with respect to the sale of the
specified digital products to the purchaser only if:
(1) There is an unsatisfied use tax liability pursuant to
paragraph (a); and
(2) The seller fraudulently failed to collect the tax or
solicited the purchaser to provide the resale certificate unlawfully.
2. As used in this section, “seller” includes a certified service
provider, as that term is defined in NRS 360B.060, acting on
behalf of a seller who is registered pursuant to NRS 360B.200.
Sec. 32. Any person who gives a resale certificate for
specified digital products which the person knows at the time of
purchase is not to be further broadcast, rebroadcast, transmitted,
retransmitted, licensed, relicensed, distributed, redistributed or
exhibited by the person in the regular course of business for the
purpose of evading payment to the seller of the amount of the tax
applicable to the transaction is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 33. 1. An excise tax is hereby imposed on the use in
this State of specified digital products purchased and
electronically transferred from any retailer on or after January 1,
2026, for use in this State at a rate equal to the sum of the rates of
all taxes imposed upon the storage, use or other consumption of
tangible personal property in the county in which the use of the
specific digital products occurs.
2. The tax imposed by subsection 1 applies whether the
purchaser obtains permanent use or less than permanent use of
the specified digital product, whether the sale is conditioned or not
conditioned upon continued payment from the purchaser and
whether the sale is on a subscription basis or is not on a
subscription basis.
3. The tax is imposed with respect to all specified digital
products which were electronically transferred in a transaction
that is taxable pursuant to this chapter but for which the tax
imposed by section 24 of this act was not collected.
Sec. 34. Every person storing, using or otherwise consuming
in this State specified digital products purchased from a retailer is
-
*SB392*

– 11 –
liable for the tax. The liability of a person pursuant to this section
is not extinguished until the tax has been paid to this State, except
that a receipt from a retailer given to the purchaser pursuant to
section 35 of this act is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from
further liability for the tax to which the receipt refers.
Sec. 35. Every retailer maintaining a place of business in
this State and making sales of specified digital products for use in
this State, not exempted by this chapter, shall, at the time of
making the sales or, if the use of the specified digital products is
not then taxable hereunder, at the time the use becomes taxable,
collect the tax from the purchaser and give to the purchaser a
receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the Nevada
Tax Commission.
Sec. 36. The tax required to be collected by the retailer
constitutes a debt owed by the retailer to this State.
Sec. 37. It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise or hold
out or state to the public or to any customer, directly or indirectly,
that the tax or any part thereof will be assumed or absorbed by the
retailer or that it will not be added to the selling price of the
specified digital products sold or that, if added, it or any part
thereof will be refunded.
Sec. 38. The tax required pursuant to this chapter to be
collected by the retailer from the purchaser must be displayed
separately from the list price, the price advertised in the premises,
the marked price, or any other price on the sales check or other
proof of sale.
Sec. 39. Any person who violates section 35, 37 or 38 of this
act is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 40. 1. Every retailer who sells specified digital
products for use in this State shall register with the Department
and give:
(a) The name and address of all agents operating in this State.
(b) The location of all offices or other places of business in
this State.
(c) Such other information as the Department may require.
2. Every business that purchases specified digital products for
use in this State shall, at the time the business obtains a state
business license pursuant to chapter 76 of NRS, register with the
Department on a form prescribed by the Department. As used in
this subsection, “business” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 76.020.
Sec. 41. For the purpose of the proper administration of this
chapter and to prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to
collect the use tax, it is presumed that specified digital products
sold by any person for delivery in this State are sold for use in this
-
*SB392*

– 12 –
State until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that
a sale of specified digital products is not a sale at retail is upon the
person who makes the sale unless the person takes from the
purchaser a certificate to the effect that the specified digital
products were purchased by an end user and the purchaser:
1. Is engaged in the business of commercial broadcasting,
rebroadcasting, transmitting, retransmitting, licensing,
relicensing, distributing, redistributing or exhibiting specified
digital products, in whole or in part, to another person or persons;
2. Is registered pursuant to NRS 360B.200 or holds a permit
issued pursuant to section 27 of this act, if required; and
3. At the time of purchasing the specified digital products,
intends to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license,
relicense, distribute, redistribute or exhibit the specified digital
products in the regular course of business or is unable to ascertain
at the time of purchase whether the specified digital products will
be used for such a purpose or will be used for some other purpose.
Sec. 42. A resale certificate must:
1. Be substantially in such form and include such
information as the Department may prescribe; and
2. Unless submitted in electronic form, be signed by the
purchaser.
Sec. 43. If a purchaser who gives a resale certificate makes
any use of the specified digital products other than the commercial
broadcasting, rebroadcasting, transmitting, retransmitting,
licensing, relicensing, distributing, redistributing or exhibiting of
the specified digital products, in whole or in part, to another
person or persons in the regular course of business, the use is
taxable as of the time any of the specified digital products is first
so stored or used.
Sec. 44. As used in sections 44 to 56, inclusive, of this act,
“exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter” means
exempted from the computation of the amount of taxes imposed.
Sec. 45. There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this
chapter the gross receipts from the sale of, and the use in this
State of, specified digital products the gross receipts from the sale
of which, or the use of which, this State is prohibited from taxing
under the Constitution or laws of the United States or under the
Constitution of this State.
Sec. 46. There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this
chapter the gross receipts from the sale of specified digital
products that are textbooks sold within the Nevada System of
Higher Education.
Sec. 47. There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this
chapter the gross receipts from the sale of, and the use in this
-
*SB392*

– 13 –
State of, specified digital products which is a newspaper regularly
issued at average intervals not exceeding 1 week and any such
newspaper.
Sec. 48. There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this
chapter the gross receipts from occasional sales of specified digital
products and the use in this State of specified digital products, the
transfer of which to the purchaser is an occasional sale.
Sec. 49. There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this
chapter the gross receipts from the sale of any specified digital
products to:
1. The United States, its unincorporated agencies and
instrumentalities.
2. Any incorporated agency or instrumentality of the United
States wholly owned by the United States or by a corporation
wholly owned by the United States.
3. The State of Nevada, its unincorporated agencies and
instrumentalities.
4. Any county, city, district or other political subdivision of
this State.
Sec. 50. There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this
chapter the gross receipts from the sale of, and the use in this
State of, any specified digital products sold by or to a nonprofit
organization created for religious, charitable or educational
purposes. The Legislature shall establish:
1. Standards for determining whether an organization is
created for religious, charitable or educational purposes.
2. Procedures for administering the provisions of this section.
Sec. 51. 1. For the purposes of section 50 of this act, an
organization is created for religious, charitable or educational
purposes if it complies with the provisions of this section.
2. An organization is created for religious purposes if:
(a) It complies with the requirements set forth in subsection 5;
and
(b) The sole or primary purpose of the organization is the
operation of a church, synagogue or other place of religious
worship at which nonprofit religious services and activities are
regularly conducted. Such an organization includes, without
limitation, an integrated auxiliary or affiliate of the organization,
men’s, women’s or youth groups established by the organization, a
school or mission society operated by the organization, an
organization of local units of a church and a convention or
association of churches.
3. An organization is created for charitable purposes if:
(a) It complies with the requirements set forth in subsection 5;
(b) The sole or primary purpose of the organization is to:
-
*SB392*

– 14 –
(1) Advance a public purpose, donate or render gratuitously
or at a reduced rate a substantial portion of its services to the
persons who are the subjects of its charitable services, and benefit
a substantial and indefinite class of persons who are the legitimate
subjects of charity;
(2) Provide services that are otherwise required to be
provided by a local government, this State or the Federal
Government; or
(3) Operate a hospital or medical facility licensed pursuant
to chapter 449 or 450 of NRS; and
(c) The organization is operating in this State.
4. An organization is created for educational purposes if:
(a) It complies with the requirements set forth in subsection 5;
and
(b) The sole or primary purpose of the organization is to:
(1) Provide athletic, cultural or social activities for
children;
(2) Provide displays or performances of the visual or
performing arts to members of the general public;
(3) Provide instruction and disseminate information on
subjects beneficial to the community;
(4) Operate a school, college or university located in this
State that conducts regular classes and provides courses of study
required for accreditation or licensing by the State Board of
Education or the Commission on Postsecondary Education, or for
membership in the Northwest Accreditation Commission or
accreditation by the Northwest Commission on Colleges and
Universities;
(5) Serve as a local or state apprenticeship committee to
advance programs of apprenticeship in this State; or
(6) Sponsor programs of apprenticeship in this State
through a trust created pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 186.
5. In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection 2, 3
or 4, as applicable, an organization is created for religious,
charitable or educational purposes if:
(a) No part of the net earnings of any such organization inures
to the benefit of a private shareholder, individual or entity;
(b) The business of the organization is not conducted for
profit;
(c) No substantial part of the business of the organization is
devoted to the advocacy of any political principle or the defeat or
passage of any state or federal legislation;
(d) The organization does not participate or intervene in any
political campaign on behalf of or in opposition to any candidate
for public office; and
-
*SB392*

– 15 –
(e) Any property sold to the organization for which an
exemption is claimed is used by the organization in this State in
furtherance of the religious, charitable or educational purposes of
the organization.
Sec. 52. There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this
chapter on the use of specified digital products any such products
loaned or donated to:
1. The United States, its unincorporated agencies and
instrumentalities.
2. Any incorporated agency or instrumentality of the United
States wholly owned by the United States or by a corporation
wholly owned by the United States.
3. The State of Nevada, its unincorporated agencies and
instrumentalities.
4. Any county, city, district or other political subdivision of
this State.
5. Any organization created for religious, charitable or
eleemosynary purposes, provided that no part of the net earnings
of any such organization inures to the benefit of any private
shareholder or individual.
Sec. 53. The use in this State of specified digital products,
the gross receipts from the sale of which are required to be
included in the measure of the tax imposed by section 24 of this
act, is exempted from the tax imposed by section 33 of this act.
Sec. 54. 1. If a purchaser wishes to claim an exemption
from the taxes imposed by this chapter, the retailer shall obtain
such information from the purchaser as is required by the
Department.
2. The Department shall, to the extent feasible, establish an
electronic system for submitting a request for an exemption. A
purchaser is not required to provide a signature to claim an
exemption if the request is submitted electronically.
3. The Department may establish a system whereby a
purchaser who is exempt from the payment of the taxes imposed
by this chapter is issued an identification number that can be
presented to the retailer at the time of sale.
4. A retailer shall maintain such records of exempt
transactions as are required by the Department and provide those
records to the Department upon request.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a retailer
who complies with the provisions of this section is not liable for
the payment of any tax imposed by this chapter if the purchaser
improperly claims an exemption. If the purchaser improperly
claims an exemption, the purchaser is liable for the payment of the
tax. The provisions of this subsection do not apply if the retailer:
-
*SB392*

– 16 –
(a) Fraudulently fails to collect the tax;
(b) Solicits a purchaser to participate in an unlawful claim of
an exemption; or
(c) Accepts a certificate of exemption from a purchaser who
claims an entity-based exemption, the subject of the transaction
sought to be covered by the certificate is actually received by the
purchaser at a location operated by the seller, and the Department
provides, and posts on a website or other Internet site that is
operated or administered by or on behalf of the Department, a
certificate of exemption which clearly and affirmatively indicates
that the claimed exemption is not available.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Entity-based exemption” means an exemption based on
who purchases the product or who sells the product, and which is
not available to all.
(b) “Retailer” includes a certified service provider, as that term
is defined in NRS 360B.060, acting on behalf of a retailer who is
registered pursuant to NRS 360B.200.
Sec. 55. 1. Any nonprofit organization created for
religious, charitable or educational purposes that wishes to claim
an exemption pursuant to section 50 of this act, must file an
application with the Department to obtain a letter of exemption.
The application must be on a form and contain such information
as is required by the Department.
2. If the Department determines that the organization is
created for religious, charitable or educational purposes, it shall
issue a letter of exemption to the organization. The letter of
exemption expires 5 years after the date on which it is issued by
the Department. At least 90 days before the expiration of the letter
of exemption, the Department shall notify the organization to
whom the letter was issued of the date on which the letter will
expire. The organization may renew its letter of exemption for an
additional 5 years by filing an application for renewal with the
Department. The application for renewal must be on a form and
contain such information as is required by the Department.
3. To claim an exemption pursuant to section 50 of this act
for the sale of specified digital products to such an organization:
(a) The organization must give a copy of its letter of exemption
to the retailer from whom the organization purchases the product;
and
(b) The retailer must retain and present upon request a copy of
the letter of exemption.
4. The Department shall adopt such regulations as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
-
*SB392*

– 17 –
Sec. 56. If a purchaser certifies in writing to a seller that the
specified digital products purchased will be used in a manner or
for a purpose entitling the seller to regard the gross receipts from
the sale as exempted by this chapter from the computation of the
amount of the taxes imposed by this chapter, and uses the
specified digital products in some other manner or for some other
purpose, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of the tax as if
the purchaser were a retailer making a retail sale of the specified
digital products at the time of such use, and the cost of the
specified digital products to the purchaser shall be deemed the
gross receipts from such retail sale.
Sec. 57. A retailer shall hold the amount of all taxes
collected pursuant to this chapter in a separate account in trust for
the State.
Sec. 58. Except as otherwise provided in section 65 of this act
or required by the Department pursuant to NRS 360B.200, the
taxes imposed by this chapter are due and payable to the
Department monthly on or before the last day of the month next
succeeding each month.
Sec. 59. Except as otherwise required by the Department
pursuant to NRS 360B.200:
1. On or before the last day of the month following each
reporting period, a return for the preceding period must be filed
with the Department in such form and manner as the Department
may prescribe. Any return required to be filed by this section must
be combined with any return required to be filed pursuant to the
provisions of chapters 372 and 374 of NRS.
2. For purposes of:
(a) The tax imposed by section 24 of this act, a return must be
filed by each seller.
(b) The tax imposed by section 33 of this act, a return must be
filed by each retailer maintaining a place of business in the State
and by each person purchasing specified digital products, the use
of which is subject to the use tax, who has not paid the use tax
due.
3. Unless filed electronically, returns must be signed by the
person required to file the return or by his or her authorized agent
but need not be verified by oath.
Sec. 60. 1. Except as otherwise required by the Department
pursuant to NRS 360B.200:
(a) For the purposes of the tax imposed by section 24 of this
act:
(1) The return must show the gross receipts of the seller
during the preceding reporting period.
-
*SB392*

– 18 –
(2) The gross receipts must be segregated and reported
separately for each county to which a sale of specified digital
products pertains.
(3) A sale pertains to the county in this State in which the
retail sale of specified digital products takes place as determined
pursuant to section 23 of this act.
(b) For purposes of the tax imposed by section 33 of this act:
(1) In the case of a return filed by a retailer, the return
must show the total sales price of the specified digital products
purchased by the retailer, the use of which specified digital
products became subject to the use tax during the preceding
reporting period.
(2) The sales price must be segregated and reported
separately for each county to which a purchase of specified digital
products pertains.
(3) If the specified digital products were:
(I) Brought into this State by the purchaser or his or her
agent or designee, the sale pertains to the county in this State in
which the property is or will be first used, stored or otherwise
consumed.
(II) Not brought into this State by the purchaser or his
or her agent or designee, the sale pertains to the county in this
State in which the property was delivered to the purchaser or his
or her agent or designee.
2. In case of a return filed by a purchaser, the return must
show the total sales price of the specified digital products
purchased by the purchaser, the use of which became subject to
the tax imposed by section 24 of this act during the preceding
reporting period and indicate the county in this State in which the
specified digital products were first used, stored or consumed.
3. The return must also show the amount of the taxes for the
period covered by the return and such other information as the
Department deems necessary for the proper administration of this
chapter.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, upon
determining that a retailer has filed a return which contains one
or more violations of the provisions of this section, the Department
shall:
(a) For the first return of any retailer which contains one or
more violations, issue a letter of warning to the retailer which
provides an explanation of the violation or violations contained in
the return.
(b) For the first or second return, other than a return
described in paragraph (a), in any calendar year which contains
one or more violations, assess a penalty equal to the amount of the
-
*SB392*

– 19 –
tax which was not reported or was reported for the wrong county
or $1,000, whichever is less.
(c) For the third and each subsequent return in any calendar
year which contains one or more violations, assess a penalty of
three times the amount of the tax which was not reported or was
reported for the wrong county or $3,000, whichever is less.
5. For the purposes of subsection 4, if the first violation of
this section by any retailer was determined by the Department
through an audit which covered more than one return of the
retailer, the Department shall treat all returns which were
determined through the same audit to contain a violation
or violations in the manner provided in paragraph (a) of
subsection 4.
Sec. 61. In determining the amount of taxes due pursuant to
this chapter:
1. The amount due must be computed to the third decimal
place and rounded to a whole cent using a method that rounds up
to the next cent if the numeral in the third decimal place is greater
than 4.
2. A retailer may compute the amount due on a transaction
on the basis of each item involved in the transaction or a single
invoice for the entire transaction.
Sec. 62. 1. If a retailer is unable to collect all or part of the
sales price of a sale, the retailer is entitled to receive a deduction
from his or her taxable sales for that bad debt.
2. Any deduction that is claimed pursuant to this section may
not include interest.
3. The amount of any deduction claimed must equal the
amount of a deduction that may be claimed pursuant to section
166 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 166, for that sale
minus:
(a) Any finance charge or interest charged as part of the sale;
(b) Any tax imposed by this chapter charged on the sales price;
(c) Any amount not paid on the sales price because the
specified digital product that was sold was not delivered until the
full sales price is paid; and
(d) Any expense incurred in attempting to collect the bad debt.
4. A bad debt may be claimed as a deduction on the return
that covers the period during which the bad debt is written off in
the business records of the retailer that are maintained in the
ordinary course of the retailer’s business and is eligible to be
claimed as a deduction pursuant to section 166 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 166, or if the retailer is not required to
file a federal income tax return, would be eligible to be claimed as
-
*SB392*

– 20 –
a deduction pursuant to section 166 of the Internal Revenue Code,
26 U.S.C. § 166.
5. If a bad debt for which a deduction has been claimed is
subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the amount
so collected must be reported on the return that covers the period
in which the collection is made.
6. If the amount of the bad debt is greater than the amount of
the taxable sales reported for the period during which the bad debt
is claimed as a deduction, a claim for a refund may be filed
pursuant to sections 69 to 87, inclusive, of this act except that the
time within which the claim may be filed begins on the date on
which the return that included the deduction was filed.
7. If the retailer has contracted with a certified service
provider for the remittance of the tax due under this chapter, the
service provider may, on behalf of the retailer, claim any
deduction to which the retailer is entitled pursuant to this section.
The service provider shall credit or refund the full amount of any
deduction or refund received pursuant to this section to the
retailer.
8. For the purposes of reporting a payment received on a bad
debt for which a deduction has been claimed, the payment must
first be applied to the sales price of the specified digital products
sold and the tax due thereon, and then to any interest, service
charge or other charge that was charged as part of the sale.
9. If the records of a retailer indicate that a bad debt may be
allocated among other states that are members of the Streamlined
Sales and Use Tax Agreement, the retailer may allocate the bad
debt among those states.
10. A retailer who assigns a debt to an entity which is part of
an affiliated group that includes the retailer may claim any
deduction or refund to which the retailer would otherwise be
entitled pursuant to this section, notwithstanding:
(a) The assignment of the debt to the entity;
(b) That the debt is written off as a bad debt in the business
records of the entity which are maintained in the ordinary course
of the entity’s business; and
(c) That the bad debt is or would be eligible to be claimed by
the entity as a deduction pursuant to section 166 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 166.
11. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 12, upon
determining that a retailer has filed a return which contains one
or more violations of the provisions of this section, the Department
shall:
(a) For the first return of any retailer which contains one or
more violations, issue a letter of warning to the retailer which
-
*SB392*

– 21 –
provides an explanation of the violation or violations contained in
the return.
(b) For the first or second return, other than a return
described in paragraph (a), in any calendar year which contains
one or more violations, assess a penalty equal to the amount of the
deduction claimed or $1,000, whichever is less.
(c) For the third and each subsequent return in any calendar
year which contains one or more violations, assess a penalty of
three times the amount of the deduction claimed or $3,000,
whichever is less.
12. For the purposes of subsection 11, if the first violation of
this section by any retailer was determined by the Department
through an audit which covered more than one return of the
retailer, the Department shall treat all returns which were
determined through the same audit to contain a violation
or violations in the manner provided in paragraph (a) of
subsection 11.
13. As used in this section:
(a) “Affiliated group” means:
(1) An affiliated group as defined in section 1504(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1504(a); or
(2) A controlled group of corporations as described in
section 1563(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §
1563(a)(2).
(b) “Bad debt” means a debt that may be deducted pursuant to
section 166 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 166.
(c) “Certified service provider” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 360B.060.
Sec. 63. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
the taxes imposed by this chapter are paid in accordance with
section 58 of this act, a taxpayer may deduct and withhold from
the taxes otherwise due from the taxpayer 0.25 percent of those
taxes as reimbursement for the cost of collecting the tax.
2. The regulations adopted by the Nevada Tax Commission
pursuant to NRS 360B.110 may authorize the deduction and
withholding from the taxes otherwise due from a taxpayer such
other amounts as are required to carry out the Streamlined Sales
and Use Tax Agreement.
Sec. 64. 1. Except as otherwise authorized or required by
the Department, the person required to file a return shall deliver
the return together with a remittance of the amount of the tax due
to the Department.
2. The Department shall provide for the acceptance of credit
cards, debit cards or electronic transfers of money for the payment
of the tax due in the manner prescribed pursuant to NRS 360.092.
-
*SB392*

– 22 –
Sec. 65. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section or
required by the Department pursuant to NRS 360B.200, the
reporting and payment period of:
(a) A taxpayer whose taxable sales do not exceed $10,000 per
month is a calendar quarter.
(b) A taxpayer who files reports on a quarterly basis in
accordance with paragraph (a) and:
(1) From whom no tax is due pursuant to this chapter for
the immediately preceding three quarterly reporting periods; or
(2) Whose taxable sales do not exceed a total amount of
$1,500 for the immediately preceding four quarterly reporting
periods,
 is 12 calendar months, unless the taxable sales of the taxpayer
exceed a total amount of $1,500 for such a 12-month reporting
and payment period or $10,000 for a calendar month.
2. The Department, if it deems this action necessary to ensure
payment to or facilitate the collection by the State of the amount of
taxes, may require returns and payment of the amount of taxes for
periods other than calendar months or quarters, depending upon
the principal place of business of the seller, retailer or purchaser,
as the case may be, or for other than monthly, quarterly or annual
periods.
Sec. 66. For the purposes of the tax imposed by section 24 of
this act, gross receipts from rentals or leases of specified digital
products must be reported and the tax paid in accordance with
such regulations as the Department may prescribe.
Sec. 67. The Department for good cause may extend for not
to exceed 1 month the time for making any return or paying any
amount required to be paid under this chapter.
Sec. 68. 1. The Department, whenever it deems it necessary
to ensure compliance with this chapter, may require any person
subject to the chapter to place with it such security as the
Department may determine. The Department shall fix the amount
of the security which, except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
may not be greater than twice the estimated average tax due
quarterly of persons filing returns for quarterly periods, three
times the estimated average tax due monthly of persons filing
returns for monthly periods or four times the estimated average
tax due annually of persons filing returns for annual periods,
determined in such a manner as the Department deems proper.
2. In the case of persons who are habitually delinquent in
their obligations under this chapter, the amount of the security
may not be greater than three times the average actual tax due
quarterly of persons filing returns for quarterly periods, five times
the average actual tax due monthly of persons filing returns for
-
*SB392*

– 23 –
monthly periods or seven times the average actual tax due
annually of persons filing returns for annual periods.
3. The limitations provided in this section apply regardless of
the type of security placed with the Department.
4. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased
by the Department subject to the limitations provided in this
section.
5. The Department may sell the security at public auction if it
becomes necessary to recover any tax or any amount required to
be collected, or interest or penalty due. Notice of the sale may be
served upon the person who placed the security personally or by
mail. If the notice is served by mail, service must be made in the
manner prescribed for service of a notice of a deficiency
determination and must be addressed to the person at his or her
address as it appears in the records of the Department. Security in
the form of a bearer bond issued by the United States or the State
of Nevada which has a prevailing market price may be sold by the
Department at a private sale at a price not lower than the
prevailing market price.
6. Upon any sale any surplus above the amounts due must be
returned to the person who placed the security.
Sec. 69. 1. If the Department determines that any amount,
penalty or interest has been paid more than once or has been
erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the Department
shall set forth that fact in the records of the Department and
certify to the State Board of Examiners the amount collected in
excess of the amount legally due and the person from whom it was
collected or by whom paid. If approved by the State Board of
Examiners, the excess amount collected or paid must, after being
credited against any amount then due from the person in
accordance with NRS 360.236, be refunded to the person, or his or
her successors, administrators or executors.
2. Any overpayment of the tax imposed by section 33 of this
act by a purchaser to a retailer who is required to collect the tax
and who gives the purchaser a receipt therefor pursuant to
sections 33 to 43, inclusive, of this act must be credited or
refunded by the State to the purchaser, subject to the requirements
of NRS 360.236.
Sec. 70. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.235 and
360.395 and section 62 of this act:
1. No refund may be allowed unless a claim for it is filed with
the Department within 3 years after the last day of the month
following the close of the period for which the overpayment was
made.
-
*SB392*

– 24 –
2. No credit may be allowed after the expiration of the period
specified for filing claims for refund unless a claim for credit is
filed with the Department within that period, or unless the credit
relates to a period for which a waiver is given pursuant to
NRS 360.355.
Sec. 71. No credit or refund of any amount paid pursuant to
sections 33 to 43, inclusive, of this act may be allowed on the
ground that the use of the specified digital products is exempted
pursuant to section 53 of this act, unless the person who paid the
amount reimburses the vendor of the specified digital products for
the amount of the tax imposed by section 24 of this act upon the
vendor of the specified digital products with respect to the sale of
the specified digital products and paid by the vendor to the State.
Sec. 72. Every claim must be in writing and state the specific
grounds upon which the claim is founded.
Sec. 73. Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in
section 70 of this act constitutes a waiver of any demand against
the State on account of overpayment.
Sec. 74. Within 30 days after disallowing any claim in whole
or in part, the Department shall serve notice of its action on the
claimant in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a
deficiency determination.
Sec. 75. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.320 or any
other specific statute, interest must be paid upon any overpayment
of any amount of tax at the rate set forth in, and in accordance
with the provisions of, NRS 360.2937.
Sec. 76. If the Department determines that any overpayment
has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall
not allow any interest thereon.
Sec. 77. No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or
equitable process shall issue in any suit, action or proceeding in
any court against the State, a county or any officer thereof to
prevent or enjoin the collection under this chapter of any tax or
any amount of tax required to be collected.
Sec. 78. No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any
court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been
erroneously or illegally determined or collected unless a claim for
refund or credit has been duly filed.
Sec. 79. 1. Within 90 days after a final decision upon a
claim filed pursuant to this chapter is rendered by the Nevada Tax
Commission, the claimant may bring an action against the
Department on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of
competent jurisdiction in Carson City, the county of this State
where the claimant resides or maintains his or her principal place
of business or a county in which any relevant proceedings were
-
*SB392*

– 25 –
conducted by the Department, for the recovery of the whole or any
part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been
disallowed.
2. Failure to bring an action within the time specified
constitutes a waiver of any demand against the State on account of
alleged overpayments.
Sec. 80. If the Department fails to mail notice of action on a
claim within 6 months after the claim is filed, the claimant may
consider the claim disallowed and file an appeal with a hearing
officer within 45 days after the last day of the 6-month period. If
the claimant is aggrieved by the decision of the hearing officer on
appeal, the claimant may, pursuant to the provisions of NRS
360.245, appeal the decision to the Nevada Tax Commission. If
the claimant is aggrieved by the decision of the Commission on
appeal, the claimant may, within 45 days after the decision is
rendered, bring an action against the Department on the grounds
set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of
the amount claimed as an overpayment.
Sec. 81. 1. If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the
amount of the judgment must first be credited as follows:
(a) If the judgment is for a refund of tax imposed by section 24
of this act, it must be credited on any amount of tax due from the
plaintiff pursuant to this chapter.
(b) If the judgment is for a refund of the tax imposed by
section 33 of this act, it must be credited on any amount of that tax
due from the plaintiff pursuant to this chapter.
2. The balance of the judgment must be refunded to the
plaintiff.
Sec. 82. In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the rate
of 3 percent per annum upon the amount found to have been
illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the
date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment, or to a
date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30
days, the date to be determined by the Department.
Sec. 83. A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the
plaintiff in any action brought against the Department to recover
any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of
an assignee of the person paying the amount or by any person
other than the person who paid the amount.
Sec. 84. The Department may recover any refund or part of it
which is erroneously made and any credit or part of it which is
erroneously allowed in an action brought in a court of competent
jurisdiction in Carson City or Clark County in the name of the
State of Nevada.
-
*SB392*

– 26 –
Sec. 85. The action must be tried in Carson City or Clark
County unless the court, with the consent of the Attorney General,
orders a change of place of trial.
Sec. 86. The Attorney General shall prosecute the action,
and the provisions of NRS, the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure
and the Nevada Rules of Appellate Procedure relating to service of
summons, pleadings, proofs, trials and appeals are applicable to
the proceedings.
Sec. 87. 1. If any amount in excess of $25 has been
illegally determined, either by the person filing the return or by the
Department, the Department shall certify this fact to the State
Board of Examiners, and the latter shall authorize the
cancellation of the amount upon the records of the Department.
2. If an amount not exceeding $25 has been illegally
determined, either by the person filing a return or by the
Department, the Department, without certifying this fact to the
State Board of Examiners, shall authorize the cancellation of
the amount upon the records of the Department.
Sec. 88. This chapter must be administered in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 360B of NRS.
Sec. 89. 1. The provisions of this chapter relating to:
(a) The imposition, collection and remittance of the tax
imposed by section 24 of this act apply to every retailer whose
activities have a sufficient nexus with this State to satisfy the
requirements of the United States Constitution.
(b) The collection and remittance of the tax imposed by section
33 of this act apply to every retailer whose activities have a
sufficient nexus with this State to satisfy the requirements of the
United States Constitution.
2. In administering the provisions of this chapter, the
Department shall construe the terms “seller,” “retailer” and
“retailer maintaining a place of business in this State” in
accordance with the provisions of subsection 1.
Sec. 90. As used in sections 90 to 97, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 91, 92 and 93 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 91. “Affiliate” means a person who directly or indirectly
owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common
ownership or control with, another person. For the purposes of
this section, control shall be presumed to exist if any person
directly or indirectly owns, controls, holds with the power to vote
or holds proxies representing 10 percent or more of the voting
securities of any other person. This presumption may be rebutted
by a showing that control does not exist in fact.
-
*SB392*

– 27 –
Sec. 92. 1. “Marketplace facilitator” means a person,
including any affiliate of the person, who:
(a) Directly or indirectly, does one or more of the following to
facilitate a retail sale:
(1) Lists, makes available or advertises specified digital
products for sale by a marketplace seller in a marketplace owned,
operated or controlled by the person;
(2) Facilitates the sale of a marketplace seller’s product
through a marketplace by transmitting or otherwise
communicating an offer or acceptance of a retail sale of specified
digital products between a marketplace seller and a purchaser in a
forum including a shop, store, booth, catalog, Internet site or
similar forum;
(3) Owns, rents, licenses, makes available or operates any
electronic or physical infrastructure or any property, process,
method, copyright, trademark or patent that connects marketplace
sellers to purchasers for the purpose of making retail sales of
specified digital products;
(4) Provides a marketplace for making retail sales of
specified digital products, or otherwise facilitates retail sales
of specified digital products, regardless of ownership or control of
the specified digital products that are the subject of the retail sale;
(5) Provides software development or research and
development activities related to any activity described in this
subsection, if such software development or research and
development activities are directly related to the physical or
electronic marketplace provided by a marketplace provider;
(6) Provides or offers fulfillment or storage services for a
marketplace seller;
(7) Sets prices for the sale of specified digital products by a
marketplace seller;
(8) Provides or offers customer service to a marketplace
seller or the customers of a marketplace seller, or accepts or
assists with taking orders, returns or exchanges of specified digital
products sold by a marketplace seller; or
(9) Brands or otherwise identifies sales as those of the
marketplace facilitator; and
(b) Directly or indirectly, does one or more of the following to
facilitate a retail sale:
(1) Collects the sales price or purchase price of a retail sale
of specified digital products;
(2) Provides payment processing services for a retail sale of
specified digital products;
(3) Charges, collects or otherwise receives selling fees,
listing fees, referral fees, closing fees, fees for inserting or making
-
*SB392*

– 28 –
available specified digital products on a marketplace or other
consideration from the facilitation of a retail sale of specified
digital products, regardless of ownership or control of the
specified digital products that are the subject of the retail sale;
(4) Through terms and conditions, agreements or
arrangements with a third party, collects payment in connection
with a retail sale of specified digital products from a purchaser
and transmits that payment to the marketplace seller, regardless of
whether the person collecting and transmitting such payment
receives compensation or other consideration in exchange for the
service; or
(5) Provides a virtual currency that purchasers are allowed
or required to use to purchase specified digital products.
2. The term does not include a person who provides Internet
advertising services, including, without limitation, the listing of
products for sale, if the person does not directly or indirectly or
through an affiliate:
(a) Transmit or otherwise communicate an offer or acceptance
of a retail sale of specified digital products between a marketplace
seller and a purchaser; and
(b) Do one or more of the activities listed in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1.
3. The term includes a provider of direct broadcast satellite
services as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 335(b)(5)(A) or a cable operator
as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 522(5) who meets the definition of
“marketplace facilitator” provided in subsection 1, including,
without limitation, by facilitating the retail sale of a software
application of a marketplace seller which may be accessed
through the digital platform owned, operated or controlled by the
provider of direct broadcast satellite service or cable operator. A
provider of direct broadcast satellite services or cable operator is
not a marketplace facilitator with respect to a software application
of a marketplace seller which may be accessed through the digital
platform owned, operated or controlled by the provider of direct
broadcast satellite services or cable operator for no additional
charge.
Sec. 93. “Marketplace seller” means:
1. A seller who makes retail sales through any physical or
electronic marketplace owned, operated or controlled by a
marketplace facilitator, even if such seller would not have been
required to collect and remit the sales tax or use tax had the sale
not been made through such marketplace; or
2. A seller who makes retail sales resulting from a referral by
a referrer, even if such seller would not have been required to
-
*SB392*

– 29 –
collect and remit the sales tax or use tax had the sale not been
made through such referrer.
Sec. 94. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
section 95 of this act, the provisions of this chapter relating to the
imposition, collection and remittance of the tax imposed by section
24 of this act, and the collection and remittance of the tax imposed
by section 33 of this act, apply to a marketplace facilitator during
a calendar year in which or during a calendar year immediately
following any calendar year in which:
(a) The cumulative gross receipts from retail sales of tangible
personal property and specified digital products made or
facilitated by the marketplace facilitator on its own behalf or for
one or more marketplace sellers to customers in this State exceed
$100,000; or
(b) The marketplace facilitator makes or facilitates 200 or
more separate retail sales transactions of tangible personal
property or specified digital products on his or her own behalf or
for one or more marketplace sellers to customers in this State.
2. The provisions of this chapter relating to the imposition,
collection and remittance of the tax imposed by section 24 of this
act and the collection and remittance of the tax imposed by section
33 of this act do not apply to a marketplace facilitator described in
subsection 1 if:
(a) The marketplace facilitator and the marketplace seller have
entered into a written agreement whereby the marketplace seller
assumes responsibility for the collection and remittance of the tax
imposed by section 24 of this act, and the collection and
remittance of the tax imposed by section 33 of this act, for retail
sales made by the marketplace seller through the marketplace
facilitator; and
(b) The marketplace seller has obtained a permit pursuant to
section 27 of this act or registered pursuant to NRS 360B.200.
 Upon request of the Department, a marketplace facilitator shall
provide to the Department a report containing the name of each
marketplace seller with whom the marketplace facilitator has
entered into an agreement pursuant to this subsection and such
other information as the Department determines is necessary to
ensure that each marketplace seller with whom the marketplace
facilitator has entered into an agreement pursuant to this
subsection has obtained a permit pursuant to section 27 of this act
or registered pursuant to NRS 360B.200.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 95
of this act, the provisions of subsection 1 apply regardless of
whether:
-
*SB392*

– 30 –
(a) The marketplace seller for whom a marketplace facilitator
makes or facilitates a retail sale would not have been required to
collect and remit the sales tax or the use tax had the retail sale not
been facilitated by the marketplace facilitator;
(b) The marketplace seller for whom a marketplace facilitator
makes or facilitates a retail sale was required to register with the
Department pursuant to NRS 360B.200 or obtain a permit
pursuant to section 27 of this act; or
(c) The amount of the sales price of a retail sale will ultimately
accrue to or benefit the marketplace facilitator, the marketplace
seller or any other person.
4. In administering the provisions of this chapter, the
Department shall construe the terms “seller,” “retailer” and
“retailer maintaining a place of business in this State” in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
Sec. 95. 1. In administering the provisions of this chapter,
the Department shall not hold a marketplace facilitator liable for
the payment of any tax imposed by this chapter which is
attributable to a retail sale made or facilitated on behalf of a
marketplace seller who is not an affiliate of the marketplace
facilitator if:
(a) The marketplace facilitator provides proof satisfactory to
the Department that the marketplace facilitator has made a
reasonable effort to obtain accurate information from the
marketplace seller about the retail sale; and
(b) The failure to collect and remit the correct tax on the retail
sale was due to incorrect information provided to the marketplace
facilitator by the marketplace seller.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, in
administering the provisions of this chapter, the Department shall
not hold a marketplace facilitator liable for the payment of any tax
imposed by this chapter which is attributable to a retail sale made
or facilitated on behalf of a marketplace seller who is not an
affiliate of the marketplace facilitator if the marketplace facilitator
provides proof satisfactory to the Department that:
(a) The retail sale was made before January 1, 2026;
(b) The retail sale was made through a marketplace of the
marketplace facilitator; and
(c) The failure to collect the tax imposed by section 24 of this
act and the tax imposed by section 33 of this act was due to an
error other than an error in sourcing the retail sale.
3. The relief from liability provided pursuant to subsection 2
for the 2026 and 2027 calendar years, respectively, must not
exceed 5 percent of the total tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of
this act owed for the calendar year on the cumulative gross
-
*SB392*

– 31 –
receipts of the marketplace facilitator from retail sales made or
facilitated by the marketplace facilitator for one or more
marketplace sellers to customers in this State.
4. If a marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability for the
collection and remittance of any amount of the tax imposed by
section 24 of this act or the tax imposed by section 33 of this act
pursuant to subsection 1, the marketplace seller or purchaser, as
applicable, is liable for the payment of such uncollected, unpaid or
unremitted tax.
5. To the extent that a marketplace facilitator is relieved of
liability for the collection and remittance of any tax pursuant to
subsections 2 and 3, the marketplace seller for whom the
marketplace facilitator made or facilitated the retail sale giving
rise to the tax is also relieved of such liability.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any
person of liability for collecting but failing to remit to the
Department any tax imposed by this chapter.
Sec. 96. 1. The Department may provide by regulation that,
except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of this
chapter relating to the imposition, collection and remittance of the
tax imposed by section 24 of this act and the collection and
remittance of the tax imposed by section 33 of this act apply to a
referrer during a calendar year in which, or during a calendar
year immediately following any calendar year in which:
(a) The cumulative gross receipts from retail sales of tangible
personal property and specified digital products to customers in
this State resulting from referrals from a platform of the referrer
are in excess of $100,000; or
(b) There are 200 or more separate retail sales transactions
involving sales of tangible personal property or specified digital
products to customers in this State resulting from referrals from a
platform of the referrer.
2. Any regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 must provide that the provisions of this chapter
relating to the imposition, collection and remittance of the tax
imposed by section 24 of this act, and the collection and
remittance of the tax imposed by section 33 of this act do not apply
to a referrer described in subsection 1 if the referrer:
(a) Posts a conspicuous notice on each platform of the referrer
that includes all of the following:
(1) A statement that tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of
this act is due on certain purchases;
(2) A statement that the marketplace seller from whom the
person is purchasing on the platform may or may not collect and
-
*SB392*

– 32 –
remit the tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act on a
purchase;
(3) A statement that Nevada requires the purchaser to pay
the tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act and file a return
for such taxes if the tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act
is not collected at the time of the sale by the marketplace seller;
(4) Information informing the purchaser that the notice is
provided under the requirements of this section; and
(5) Instructions for obtaining additional information from
the Department regarding whether and how to remit the tax
imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act;
(b) The referrer provides a monthly notice to each marketplace
seller to whom the referrer made a referral of a potential customer
located in this State during the previous calendar year, which
monthly notice shall contain all of the following:
(1) A statement that Nevada imposes the tax imposed by
sections 24 and 33 of this act on retail sales in this State;
(2) A statement that a marketplace facilitator or other
retailer making retail sales in this State must collect and remit the
tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act; and
(3) Instructions for obtaining additional information from
the Department regarding the collection and remittance of the tax
imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act; and
(c) The referrer provides the Department with periodic reports
in an electronic format and in the manner prescribed by the
Department, which reports contain all of the following:
(1) A list of marketplace sellers who received a notice from
the referrer pursuant to paragraph (b);
(2) A list of marketplace sellers that collect and remit the
tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act and that list or
advertise the marketplace seller’s products for sale on a platform
of the referrer; and
(3) An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from an
officer of the referrer affirming that the referrer made reasonable
efforts to comply with the applicable notice and reporting
requirements of this subsection.
3. Any regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 must provide that in administering the provisions of
this chapter, the Department shall construe the terms “seller,”
“retailer” and “retailer maintaining a place of business in this
State” in accordance with the provisions of this section.
4. Any regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 must apply only to referrals by a referrer and shall
not preclude the applicability of other provisions of this chapter to
-
*SB392*

– 33 –
a person who is a referrer and is also a retailer, a marketplace
facilitator or a marketplace seller.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Platform” means an electronic or physical medium,
including, without limitation, an Internet site or catalog, that is
owned, operated or controlled by a referrer.
(b) “Referral” means the transfer through telephone, Internet
link or other means by a referrer of a potential customer to a
retailer or seller who advertises or lists specified digital products
for sale on a platform of the referrer.
(c) “Referrer”:
(1) Means a person who does all of the following:
(I) Contracts or otherwise agrees with a retailer, seller
or marketplace facilitator to list or advertise for sale specified
digital products of the retailer, seller or marketplace facilitator on
a platform, provided such listing or advertisement identifies
whether or not the retailer, seller or marketplace facilitator
collects the tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act;
(II) Receives a commission, fee or other consideration
from the retailer, seller or marketplace facilitator for the listing or
advertisement;
(III) Provides referrals to a retailer, seller or
marketplace facilitator, or an affiliate of a retailer, seller or
marketplace facilitator; and
(IV) Does not collect money or other consideration from
the customer for the transaction.
(2) Does not include:
(I) A person primarily engaged in the business of
printing or publishing a newspaper; or
(II) A person who does not provide the retailer’s, seller’s
or marketplace facilitator’s shipping terms and who does not
advertise whether a retailer, seller or marketplace facilitator
collects the tax imposed by sections 24 and 33 of this act.
Sec. 97. 1. Nothing in sections 90 to 97, inclusive, of this
act shall be construed to create any remedy or private right of
action against a marketplace facilitator.
2. A marketplace facilitator that is required to collect taxes
imposed by this chapter is immune from civil liability for claims
arising from or related to the overpayment of taxes imposed by this
chapter if the marketplace facilitator acted in good faith and
without malicious intent.
3. Nothing in this section applies to or otherwise limits:
(a) Any claim, action, mandate, power, remedy or discretion of
the Department, or an agent or designee of the Department.
-
*SB392*

– 34 –
(b) The right of a taxpayer to seek a refund pursuant to
sections 69 to 87, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 98. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is
presumed that the provisions of this chapter relating to the
imposition, collection and remittance of the tax imposed by section
24 of this act, and the collection and remittance of the tax imposed
by section 33 of this act, apply to a retailer if:
(a) The retailer is part of a controlled group of corporations
that has a component member, other than a common carrier
acting in its capacity as such, that has physical presence in this
State; and
(b) The component member with physical presence in this
State:
(1) Sells a similar line of products or services as the retailer
and does so under a business name that is the same or similar to
that of the retailer;
(2) Maintains an office, distribution facility, warehouse or
storage place or similar place of business in this State to facilitate
the delivery of products or services sold by the retailer to the
retailer’s customers;
(3) Uses trademarks, service marks or trade names in this
State that are the same or substantially similar to those used by the
retailer;
(4) Delivers, installs, assembles or performs maintenance
services for the retailer’s customers within this State;
(5) Facilitates the retailer’s delivery of products or services
to customers in this State by allowing the retailer’s customers to
pick up or receive products or services sold by the retailer at an
office, distribution facility, warehouse, storage place or similar
place of business maintained by the component member in this
State; or
(6) Conducts any other activities in this State that are
significantly associated with the retailer’s ability to establish and
maintain a market in this State for the retailer’s products or
services.
2. A retailer may rebut the presumption set forth in
subsection 1 by providing proof satisfactory to the Department
that, during the calendar year in question, the activities of the
component member with physical presence in this State are not
significantly associated with the retailer’s ability to establish or
maintain a market in this State for the retailer’s products or
services.
3. In administering the provisions of this chapter, the
Department shall construe the terms “seller,” “retailer” and
-
*SB392*

– 35 –
“retailer maintaining a place of business in this State” in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Component member” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 1563(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §
1563(b), and includes any entity that, notwithstanding its form of
organization, bears the same ownership relationship to the retailer
as a corporation that would qualify as a component member of the
same controlled group of corporations as the retailer.
(b) “Controlled group of corporations” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C. § 1563(a), and includes any entity that, notwithstanding its
form of organization, bears the same ownership relationship to the
retailer as a corporation that would qualify as a component
member of the same controlled group of corporations as the
retailer.
Sec. 99. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is
presumed that the provisions of this chapter relating to:
(a) The imposition, collection and remittance of the tax
imposed by section 24 of this act; and
(b) The collection and remittance of the tax imposed by section
33 of this act,
 apply to every retailer who enters into an agreement with a
resident of this State under which the resident, for a commission
or other consideration based upon the sale of specified digital
products by the retailer, directly or indirectly refers potential
customers, whether by a link on an Internet website or otherwise,
to the retailer, if the cumulative gross receipts from sales by the
retailer to customers in this State who are referred to the retailer
by all residents with this type of an agreement with the retailer is
in excess of $10,000 during the preceding four quarterly periods
ending on the last day of March, June, September and December.
2. A retailer may rebut the presumption set forth in
subsection 1 by providing proof satisfactory to the Department that
each resident with whom the retailer has an agreement did not
engage in any activity in this State that was significantly
associated with the retailer’s ability to establish or maintain a
market in this State for the retailer’s products or services during
the preceding four quarterly periods ending on the last day of
March, June, September and December. Such proof may consist
of the sworn written statements of each resident with whom the
retailer has an agreement stating that the resident did not engage
in any solicitation in this State on behalf of the retailer during the
preceding four quarterly periods ending on the last day of March,
-
*SB392*

– 36 –
June, September and December, if the statements were obtained
from each resident and provided to the Department in good faith.
3. In administering the provisions of this chapter, the
Department shall construe the terms “seller,” “retailer” and
“retailer maintaining a place of business in this State” in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
Sec. 100. 1. The provisions of this chapter relating to the
imposition, collection and remittance of the tax imposed by section
24 of this act, and the collection and remittance of the tax imposed
by section 33 of this act apply to a retailer who does not maintain a
place of business in this State if, in the immediately preceding
calendar year or the current calendar year:
(a) The gross revenue of the retailer from the retail sale of
tangible personal property or specified digital products, or the total
gross revenue of the retailer from the retail sale of tangible
personal property and specified digital products, in transactions
that took place in this State, as determined pursuant to NRS
360B.350 to 360B.375, inclusive, or section 23 of this act, as
applicable, is greater than $100,000.
(b) The retailer had 200 or more transactions that took place
in this State, as determined pursuant to NRS 360B.350 to
360B.375, inclusive, or section 23 of this act, as applicable, in
which tangible personal property or specified digital products were
sold at retail.
2. In administering the provisions of this chapter, the
Department shall construe the terms “seller,” “retailer” and
“retailer maintaining a place of business in this State” in
accordance with the provisions of subsection 1.
Sec. 101. 1. The Department shall enforce the provisions of
this chapter and may adopt regulations relating to the
administration and enforcement of this chapter.
2. The Department may prescribe the extent to which any
regulation may be applied without retroactive effect.
Sec. 102. In administering the provisions of section 49 of this
act, the Department shall apply the exemption for the sale of
specified digital products to the State of Nevada, its
unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities to include all
specified digital products that are sold to:
1. A member of the Nevada National Guard who is engaged
in full-time National Guard duty, as defined in 10 U.S.C. §
101(d)(5) and has been called into active service.
2. A relative of a member of the Nevada National Guard
eligible for the exemption pursuant to subsection 1 who:
(a) Resides in the same home or dwelling in this State as the
member; and
-
*SB392*

– 37 –
(b) Is related by blood, adoption or marriage within the first
degree of consanguinity or affinity to the member.
3. A relative of a deceased member of the Nevada National
Guard who was engaged in full-time National Guard duty, as
defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(d)(5), and who was killed while
performing his or her duties as a member of the Nevada National
Guard during a period when the member was called into active
service. To be eligible under this subsection, the relative must be a
person who:
(a) Resided in the same house or dwelling in this State as the
deceased member; and
(b) Was related by blood, adoption or marriage within the first
degree of consanguinity or affinity to the deceased member.
Sec. 103. 1. A person who wishes to claim an exemption
pursuant to section 102 of this act must file an application with the
Department to obtain a letter of exemption. The application must
be on a form and contain such information as is required by the
Department.
2. If the Department determines that a person is eligible for
the exemption provided pursuant to section 102 of this act, the
Department shall issue a letter of exemption to the person. A letter
of exemption issued to a member of the Nevada National Guard
described in subsection 1 of section 102 of this act or a relative of
a member described in subsection 2 of section 102 of this act
expires on the date on which the person no longer meets the
qualifications for eligibility. A letter of exemption issued to a
relative of a deceased member of the Nevada National Guard
described in subsection 3 of section 102 of this act expires on the
date 3 years after the date of the death of the member.
3. To claim an exemption pursuant to section 102 of this act
for the sale of specified digital products to such a person:
(a) The person must provide a copy of the letter of exemption
to the retailer from whom the person purchases the specified
digital products; and
(b) The retailer must retain and present upon request a copy of
the letter of exemption to the Department.
4. The Department shall adopt such regulations as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 104. The Department may employ accountants,
auditors, investigators, assistants and clerks necessary for the
efficient administration of this chapter, and may delegate
authority to its representatives to conduct hearings, adopt
regulations or perform any other duties imposed by this chapter.
Sec. 105. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
any broadcaster, printer, outdoor advertising firm, advertising
-
*SB392*

– 38 –
distributor or publisher which broadcasts, publishes, displays or
distributes paid commercial advertising in this State which is
intended to be disseminated primarily to persons located in this
State and is only secondarily disseminated to bordering
jurisdictions, including advertising appearing exclusively in a
Nevada edition or section of a national publication, must be
regarded, for the purposes set forth in subsection 2 only, as the
agent of the person or entity placing the advertisement, and as a
retailer maintaining a place of business in this State.
2. The agency created by this section is solely for the purpose
of the proper administration of this chapter, to prevent evasion of
the tax imposed by section 33 of this act and the duty to collect that
tax, and to provide a presence in Nevada for the collection of the
tax imposed by section 33 of this act by and from advertisers and
sellers who do not otherwise maintain a place of business in this
State. The agent has no responsibility to report, or liability to pay,
any tax imposed under this chapter and is not restricted by the
provisions of this chapter from accepting advertisements from
advertisers or sellers who do not otherwise maintain a place of
business in this State.
Sec. 106. 1. Every seller, every retailer and every person
storing, using or otherwise consuming in this State specified
digital products purchased from a retailer shall keep records,
receipts, invoices and other pertinent papers in such form as the
Department may require.
2. Every seller, retailer or person who files the returns
required under this chapter shall keep the records for not less than
4 years from their making unless the Department in writing
sooner authorizes their destruction.
3. Every seller, retailer or person who fails to file the returns
required under this chapter shall keep the records for not less than
8 years from their making unless the Department in writing
sooner authorizes their destruction.
Sec. 107. 1. The Department, or any person authorized in
writing by the Department, may examine the books, papers,
records and equipment of any person selling specified digital
products and any person liable for the tax imposed by section 33 of
this act and may investigate the character of the business of the
person to verify the accuracy of any return made or, if no return is
made by the person, to ascertain and determine the amount
required to be paid.
2. Any person selling or purchasing specified digital products
in this State who:
(a) Is required to:
-
*SB392*

– 39 –
(1) Obtain a permit pursuant to section 27 of this act or
register pursuant to NRS 360B.200; or
(2) File a return pursuant to subsection 2 of section 59 of
this act; and
(b) Keeps outside of this State his or her records, receipts,
invoices and other documents relating to sales the person has
made or the tax imposed by section 33 of this act due this State,
 shall pay to the Department an amount equal to the allowance
provided for state officers and employees generally while traveling
outside of the State for each day or fraction thereof during which
an employee of the Department is engaged in examining those
documents, plus any other actual expenses incurred by the
employee while he or she is absent from his or her regular place of
employment to examine those documents.
Sec. 108. In its administration of the tax imposed by section
33 of this act, the Department may require the filing of reports by
any person or class of persons having in their possession or
custody information relating to sales of specified digital products,
the use of which is subject to the tax. The report must:
1. Be filed when the Department requires.
2. Set forth the names and addresses of purchasers of the
specified digital products, the sales price of the specified digital
products, the date of sale and such other information as the
Department may require.
Sec. 109. Any retailer or other person who fails or refuses to
furnish any return required to be made, or who fails or refuses to
furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the
Department, or who renders a false or fraudulent return shall be
fined not more than $500 for each offense.
Sec. 110. Any person required to make, render, sign or verify
any report who makes any false or fraudulent return, with intent
to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by
law to be made, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall for
each offense be fined not less than $300 nor more than $5,000, or
be imprisoned for not more than 364 days in the county jail, or be
punished by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 111. Any violation of this chapter, except as otherwise
provided, is a misdemeanor.
Sec. 112. Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal
provisions of this chapter must be instituted within 3 years after
the commission of the offense.
Sec. 113. In the determination of any case arising under this
chapter, the rule of res judicata is applicable only if the liability
involved is for the same period as was involved in another case
previously determined.
-
*SB392*

– 40 –
Sec. 114. 1. All fees, taxes, interest and penalties imposed
and all amounts of tax required to be paid to the State under this
chapter must be paid to the Department in the form of remittances
payable to the Department.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
Department shall deposit the payments in the State Treasury to the
credit of each account in the State General Fund to which is
credited a tax imposed upon sales at retail of tangible personal
property and use tax due on the purchase of tangible personal
property for use in this State, in the proportion that would be
credited to each account if the fees, taxes, interest and penalties
imposed or required to be paid to the State under this chapter were
a tax upon sales at retail of tangible personal property or use tax
due on the purchase of tangible personal property for use in this
State.
3. The payments pursuant to this chapter which, in the
absence of this subsection, would be allocated pursuant to NRS
377.055 and 377.057 must instead be distributed to the county to
which the underlying retail sale of specified digital products is
deemed to take place pursuant to section 23 of this act.
Sec. 115. The money in the accounts described in subsection
2 of section 114 of this act may, upon order of the State
Controller, be used for refunds under this chapter.
Sec. 116. The remedies of the State provided for in this
chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the Department or
the Attorney General constitutes an election by the State to pursue
any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which
provision is made in this chapter.
Sec. 117. The imposition of taxes by this chapter, the
categories of transactions upon which taxes are imposed and the
specification of exemptions are exclusive. The Nevada Tax
Commission and the Department shall not construe any provision
of this chapter to authorize the imposition of a tax imposed by this
chapter upon any transaction not expressly made taxable by this
chapter.
Sec. 118. NRS 360.261 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.261 Not later than 30 days after the Department or the
Nevada Tax Commission makes a finding or ruling, or enters into an
agreement with a retailer providing, that the provisions of chapters
372 and 374 of NRS and sections 2 to 117, inclusive, of this act
relating to the imposition, collection and remittance of [the sales] a
tax [, and the collection and remittance of the use tax,] do not apply
to the retailer, despite the presence in this State of an office,
distribution facility, warehouse or storage place or similar place of
business which is owned or operated by the retailer or an affiliate of
-
*SB392*

– 41 –
the retailer, whether the finding, ruling or agreement is written or
oral and whether the finding, ruling or agreement is express or
implied, the Department shall submit a report of the finding, ruling
or agreement to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
1. If the Legislature is in session, the Legislature; or
2. If the Legislature is not in session, the Legislative
Commission.
Sec. 119. NRS 360.2937 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
360.2937 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
NRS 360.320 or any other specific statute, and notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 360.2935, interest must be paid
upon an overpayment of any tax provided for in chapter 362, 363A,
363B, 363C, 363D, 369, 370, 372, 372B, 374, 377, 377A, 377C or
377D of NRS [,] or sections 2 to 117, inclusive, of this act, any of
the taxes provided for in NRS 372A.290, any fee provided for in
NRS 444A.090, 482.313, 482C.230 or 482C.240, or any assessment
provided for in NRS 585.497, at the rate of 0.25 percent per month
from the last day of the calendar month following the period for
which the overpayment was made.
2. No refund or credit may be made of any interest imposed on
the person making the overpayment with respect to the amount
being refunded or credited.
3. The interest must be paid:
(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month
following the date upon which the person making the overpayment,
if the person has not already filed a claim, is notified by the
Department that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the
claim is certified to the State Board of Examiners, whichever is
earlier.
(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which
interest is computed on the tax or the amount against which the
credit is applied.
Sec. 120. NRS 360.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.300 1. If a person fails to file a return or the Department
is not satisfied with the return or returns of any tax, contribution or
premium or amount of tax, contribution or premium required to be
paid to the State by any person, in accordance with the applicable
provisions of this chapter, chapter 360B, 362, 363A, 363B, 363C,
363D, 369, 370, 372, 372A, 372B, 374, 377, 377A, 377C, 377D or
444A of NRS, NRS 482.313, 482C.230 or 482C.240, or chapter 585
or 680B of NRS [,] or sections 2 to 117, inclusive, of this act, as
administered or audited by the Department, it may compute and
determine the amount required to be paid upon the basis of:
-
*SB392*

– 42 –
(a) The facts contained in the return;
(b) Any information within its possession or that may come into
its possession; or
(c) Reasonable estimates of the amount.
2. One or more deficiency determinations may be made with
respect to the amount due for one or for more than one period.
3. In making its determination of the amount required to be
paid, the Department shall impose interest on the amount of tax
determined to be due, calculated at the rate and in the manner set
forth in NRS 360.417, unless a different rate of interest is
specifically provided by statute.
4. The Department shall impose a penalty of 10 percent in
addition to the amount of a determination that is made in the case of
the failure of a person to file a return with the Department.
5. When a business is discontinued, a determination may be
made at any time thereafter within the time prescribed in NRS
360.355 as to liability arising out of that business, irrespective of
whether the determination is issued before the due date of the
liability.
Sec. 121. NRS 360.417 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.417 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and
360.320, and unless a different penalty or rate of interest is
specifically provided by statute, any person who fails to pay any tax
provided for in chapter 362, 363A, 363B, 363C, 363D, 369, 370,
372, 372B, 374, 377, 377A, 377C, 377D, 444A or 585 of NRS [,] or
sections 2 to 117, inclusive, of this act, any of the taxes provided
for in NRS 372A.290, or any fee provided for in NRS 482.313,
482C.230 or 482C.240, and any person or governmental entity that
fails to pay any fee provided for in NRS 360.787, to the State or a
county within the time required, shall pay a penalty of not more than
10 percent of the amount of the tax or fee which is owed, as
determined by the Department, in addition to the tax or fee, plus
interest at the rate of 0.75 percent per month, or fraction of a month,
from the last day of the month following the period for which the
amount or any portion of the amount should have been reported
until the date of payment. The amount of any penalty imposed must
be based on a graduated schedule adopted by the Nevada Tax
Commission which takes into consideration the length of time the
tax or fee remained unpaid.
Sec. 122. NRS 360.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.510 1. If any person is delinquent in the payment of any
tax or fee administered by the Department or if a determination has
been made against the person which remains unpaid, the
Department may:
-
*SB392*

– 43 –
(a) Not later than 3 years after the payment became delinquent
or the determination became final; or
(b) Not later than 6 years after the last recording of an abstract
of judgment or of a certificate constituting a lien for tax owed,
 give a notice of the delinquency and a demand to transmit
personally or by registered or certified mail to any person,
including, without limitation, any officer or department of this State
or any political subdivision or agency of this State, who has in his or
her possession or under his or her control any credits or other
personal property belonging to the delinquent, or owing any debts to
the delinquent or person against whom a determination has been
made which remains unpaid, or owing any debts to the delinquent or
that person. In the case of any state officer, department or agency,
the notice must be given to the officer, department or agency before
the Department presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the
State Controller.
2. A state officer, department or agency which receives such a
notice may satisfy any debt owed to it by that person before it
honors the notice of the Department.
3. After receiving the demand to transmit, the person notified
by the demand may not transfer or otherwise dispose of the credits,
other personal property, or debts in his or her possession or under
his or her control at the time the person received the notice until the
Department consents to a transfer or other disposition.
4. Every person notified by a demand to transmit shall, within
10 days after receipt of the demand to transmit, inform the
Department of and transmit to the Department all such credits, other
personal property or debts in his or her possession, under his or her
control or owing by that person within the time and in the manner
requested by the Department. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 5, no further notice is required to be served to that
person.
5. If the property of the delinquent taxpayer consists of a series
of payments owed to him or her, the person who owes or controls
the payments shall transmit the payments to the Department until
otherwise notified by the Department. If the debt of the delinquent
taxpayer is not paid within 1 year after the Department issued the
original demand to transmit, the Department shall issue another
demand to transmit to the person responsible for making the
payments informing him or her to continue to transmit payments to
the Department or that his or her duty to transmit the payments to
the Department has ceased.
6. If the notice of the delinquency seeks to prevent the transfer
or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or credit union or other
credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of
-
*SB392*

– 44 –
a bank, credit union or other depository institution, the notice must
be delivered or mailed to any branch or office of the bank, credit
union or other depository institution at which the deposit is carried
or at which the credits or personal property is held.
7. If any person notified by the notice of the delinquency
makes any transfer or other disposition of the property or debts
required to be withheld or transmitted, to the extent of the value of
the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, that
person is liable to the State for any indebtedness due pursuant to this
chapter, chapter 360B, 362, 363A, 363B, 363C, 363D, 369, 370,
372, 372A, 372B, 374, 377, 377A, 377C, 377D or 444A of NRS,
NRS 482.313, 482C.230 or 482C.240, or chapter 585 or 680B of
NRS or sections 2 to 117, inclusive, of this act from the person with
respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason
of the transfer or other disposition the State is unable to recover the
indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the
notice was given.
Sec. 123. Chapter 360B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Specified digital products” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 21 of this act.
Sec. 124. NRS 360B.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
360B.030 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 360B.040 to
360B.100, inclusive, and section 123 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 125. NRS 360B.063 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
360B.063 “Purchaser” means a person to whom a sale of
tangible personal property or specified digital products is made.
Sec. 126. NRS 360B.080 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
360B.080 “Seller” means any person making sales, leases or
rentals of tangible personal property [.] or specified digital
products.
Sec. 127. NRS 360B.320 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
360B.320 1. The Department shall provide public
notification to consumers of tangible personal property [,] or
specified digital products, including purchasers who are exempt
from any sales and use taxes, of the practices of this State relating to
the collection, use and retention of any personally identifiable
information.
-
*SB392*

– 45 –
2. The Department shall not retain any personally identifiable
information if the information is no longer required to ensure the
validity of exemptions from sales and use taxes.
3. When any personally identifiable information that identifies
a natural person is retained by or on behalf of the State, that person
is entitled to reasonable access to that information to correct any
portion thereof which has been inaccurately recorded.
4. If any person or other entity, except a state which is a
member of the Agreement or any person or other entity who is
entitled to such information pursuant to any state law or the
Agreement, requests any personally identifiable information
maintained by the Department, the Department shall make a
reasonable and timely effort to notify any person who is identified
by the requested information.
5. The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this
section.
6. As used in this section, “personally identifiable information”
means information that identifies:
(a) A participant in the system created pursuant to the
Agreement; or
(b) A consumer of tangible personal property or specified
digital products who deals with a registered seller that elects to use
a certified service provider as its agent to perform all the functions
of the seller relating to sales and use taxes, other than the obligation
of the seller to remit the taxes on its own purchases.
Sec. 128. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 129. NRS 360B.483 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 130. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage
and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 129, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting
regulations and taking such other actions as are necessary to carry
out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
360B.483 “Specified digital products” construed.
1. “Specified digital products” means electronically transferred
digital audio works, digital audiovisual works and digital books.
-
*SB392*

– 46 –
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Digital audio works” means works that result from the
fixation of a series of musical, spoken or other sounds, including
ringtones.
(b) “Digital audiovisual works” means a series of related images
which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion,
together with accompanying sounds, if any.
(c) “Digital books” means works that are generally recognized
in the ordinary and usual sense as books.
(d) “Electronically transferred” means obtained by a purchaser
by means other than tangible storage media.
(e) “Ringtones” means digitized sound files that are downloaded
onto a device and may be used to alert the customer with respect to
a communication.
H
-
*SB392*